District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-779

Admission of pay patients to psychopathic ward of General Hospital.

Repealed.

History

June 7, 1924, 43 Stat. 568, ch. 302, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(g), 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-109.
1973 Ed., § 32-308.